Utah statutes.
54-8-27.   Bill for conversion costs -- Not to exceed estimate -- Payment
within thirty days -- Accounting procedures.
Upon completion of the conversion contemplated by this chapter, the public
utility corporation shall present the governing body with its verified bill
for conversion costs as computed pursuant to Section 54-8-24 but based upon
the actual cost of constructing the underground facility rather than the
estimated cost of the facility. In no event shall the bill for conversion cost
presented by the public utility corporation exceed the amount of estimated
conversion costs by the public utility corporation. In the event the
conversion costs are less than the estimated conversion costs, each owner
within the improvement district shall receive the benefit, prorated in such
form and at such time or times as the governing body may determine. The bill
of the public utility corporation shall be paid within thirty days by the
governing body from the improvement district funds. In determining the actual
cost of constructing the underground facility the public utility shall use its
standard accounting procedures, such as the Uniform System of Accounts as
defined by the Federal Communications Commission or the Federal Power
Commission and as is in use at the time of the conversion by the public
utility involved.
